Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201621-2,105
Officers.

(MBCA 8.40) (a) A corporation has the
officers described in its bylaws or appointed by the board of directors in
accordance with the bylaws.

(b) The board of directors
may elect individuals to fill one or more offices of the corporation. An officer
may appoint one or more officers if authorized by the bylaws or the board
of directors.

(c)
The bylaws or the board of directors shall assign to one of the officers responsibility
for preparing the minutes of the directors' and shareholders' meetings and
for maintaining and authenticating the records of the corporation required
to be kept under subsections (a) and (e) of section 21-2,221.

(d) The same individual
may simultaneously hold more than one office in a corporation.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 105.
January 1, 2017